Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.230

Dismissal for failure to give security.

After the lapse of ninety days from the service of notice that security is required or of an order for new or additional security, upon proof thereof, and that no undertaking as required has been filed, the court or judge may order the action to be dismissed.

[ 1933 c 14 s 1; RRS s 495-2.]